Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,117
Commission; officers; duties.

The commission shall organize by selecting a chairperson, a vice-chairperson, and a secretary from among its members, who shall hold office at the pleasure of the commission. The vice-chairperson shall act as chairperson in the absence of the chairperson or in the event of a vacancy in that position. The secretary shall keep all records of meetings and actions taken by the commission.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 117.